Vermont, session 2025-2026, H552.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 21 V.S.A. § 471 is amended to read:
§ 471. DEFINITIONS
As used in this subchapter:
* * *
(5) “Employee” means a person who, in consideration of direct or
indirect gain or profit, has been continuously employed by the same employer
for a period of one year for an average of at least 30 hours per week or meets
the service requirement set forth in 29 C.F.R. § 825.801 (airline flight crew
VT LEG #385636 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.552
2026 Page 2 of 2
employees) or 29 C.F.R. § 825.110(c)(3) (full-time teachers, as defined in 29
C.F.R. § 825.102, of an elementary or secondary school system or institution
of higher education).
* * *
Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2026.
VT LEG #385636 v.1